Vermont, session 2025-2026, H769.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #386015 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.769
2026 Page 2 of 5
(1) Fostering age-appropriate independence in children promotes
resilience, self-confidence, and community engagement essential for children’s
well-being and development.
(2) Parental rights to make reasonable decisions about their children’s
activities should be protected, provided such decisions do not endanger the
child’s health, safety, or welfare.
(3) Clarifying the definition of neglect ensures parents are not unfairly
penalized for allowing safe, independent activities appropriate to a child’s age
and maturity.
(4) Supporting family autonomy aligns with Vermont’s commitment to
child welfare while preventing unnecessary State intervention.
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 4912 is amended to read:
§ 4912. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Abused or neglected child” means a child whose physical health,
psychological growth and development, or welfare is harmed or is at
substantial risk of serious harm by the acts or omissions of his or her the
child’s parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare. An “abused
or neglected child” also means a child who is sexually abused or at substantial
risk of sexual abuse by any person and a child who has died as a result of abuse
or neglect. An “abused or neglected child” does not include a child who has
VT LEG #386015 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.769
2026 Page 3 of 5
been permitted to engage in independent activities without supervision,
provided the activities are appropriate based on the child’s age, maturity, and
physical condition.
* * *
(18) “Independent activities” includes:
(A) traveling to and from school or nearby locations by walking,
running, or bicycling;
(B) traveling to nearby commercial, recreational, or community
facilities;
(C) engaging in outdoor play;
(D) remaining at home unattended for a reasonable period of time;
(E) remaining in a vehicle if the temperature is not dangerously hot
or cold, except as prohibited by law; and
(F) engaging in similar activities alone or with other children.
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 4915b is amended to read:
§ 4915b. PROCEDURES FOR INVESTIGATION
* * *
(f) The Department shall not substantiate cases in which neglect is caused
solely by the lack of financial resources of the parent or guardian or specific
information that a reasonable parent or guardian with the education and from
VT LEG #386015 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.769
2026 Page 4 of 5
the culture of the parent or guardian would not have known, understood, or
practiced.
Sec. 4. 33 V.S.A. § 5102(3) is amended to read:
(3) “Child in need of care or supervision (CHINS)” means a child who:
(A) Has been abandoned or abused by the child’s parent, guardian, or
custodian. A person is considered to have abandoned a child if the person is
unwilling to have physical custody of the child; unable, unwilling, or has failed
to make appropriate arrangements for the child’s care; unable to have physical
custody of the child and has not arranged or cannot arrange for the safe and
appropriate care of the child; or has left the child with a care provider and the
care provider is unwilling or unable to provide care or support for the child, the
whereabouts of the person are unknown, and reasonable efforts to locate the
person have been unsuccessful.
(B) Is without proper parental care or subsistence, education,
medical, or other care necessary for his or her the child’s well-being.
(C) Is without or beyond the control of his or her the child’s parent,
guardian, or custodian.
(D) Is habitually and without justification truant from compulsory
school attendance.
VT LEG #386015 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.769
2026 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 5. IMPLEMENTATION
(a) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department for Children and Families
shall update any policies to reflect changes included in this act and conduct
public outreach to inform families and the community about the protections in
law for reasonable childhood independence.
(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the Department for Children and Families
shall conduct training for appropriate staff regarding the changes included in
this act and any updated policies.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386015 v.2